Washington statutes.
RCW 15.140.030

Agricultural commodity program—Rule-making authority.

(1) The department must develop an agricultural commodity program to replace the industrial hemp research pilot program in *chapter 15.120 RCW, in accordance with the agriculture improvement act of 2018.

(2) The department has sole regulatory authority over the production of hemp and may adopt rules to implement this chapter. All rules relating to hemp, including any testing of hemp, are outside of the control and authority of the liquor and cannabis board.

(3) If the department adopts rules implementing this chapter that are effective by June 1, 2019, persons licensed to grow hemp under *chapter 15.120 RCW may transfer into the regulatory program established in this chapter, and continue hemp production under this chapter. If the department adopts rules implementing this chapter that are effective after June 1, 2019, people licensed to grow hemp under *chapter 15.120 RCW may continue hemp production under this chapter as of the effective date of the rules.

(4) Immediately upon April 26, 2019, and before the adoption of rules implementing this chapter, persons licensed to grow hemp under *chapter 15.120 RCW may produce hemp in a manner otherwise consistent with the provisions of this chapter and the agriculture improvement act of 2018.

[ 2019 c 158 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 15.120 RCW was repealed by 2019 c 158 s 15.